Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-225
Precinct and district inspectors; duties.

(1) The precinct inspector appointed pursuant to section 32-223 shall be present in the polling place of the precinct during all elections and act as the personal agent and deputy of the election commissioner. The precinct inspector shall enforce the Election Act and see that all proceedings are in accordance with the instructions, rules, regulations, and laws and shall challenge any voter whose name does not appear on the election register or who the precinct inspector believes is impersonating a person whose name appears on the register or is attempting to vote illegally. The precinct inspector shall ensure that the judges and clerks of election comply with the act in the conduct of the election.

(2) A district inspector appointed pursuant to section 32-223 shall oversee the procedures of a group of polling places and shall act as the personal agent and deputy of the election commissioner. The district inspector shall ensure that the Election Act is uniformly enforced at the polling places assigned to him or her and perform tasks assigned by the election commissioner. The district inspector may perform all of the duties required of a precinct inspector.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 45.

It is the duty of election commissioner and his assistants to see that judges and clerks obey the law, conduct and canvass the votes, and make prompt returns to the election commissioner. State ex rel. Williams v. Moorhead, 96 Neb. 559, 148 N.W. 552 (1914), reversing 95 Neb. 80, 144 N.W. 1055 (1914).